North Carolina, session 2025, SB434.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The hourly rate of the minimum salary for all noncertified public
school employees shall be at least seventeen dollars ($17.00) per hour. The State Board of
Education shall increase the minimum of all salary grades and ranges it maintains for noncertified
public school employees, as necessary, to achieve a minimum hourly rate of at least seventeen
dollars ($17.00) per hour.
SECTION 1.(b) Funds provided to local school administrative units pursuant to this
act may be used to supplement the salaries of noncertified public school employees whose
salaries are supported from non-State funds to meet the minimum hourly rate of at least seventeen
dollars ($17.00) per hour required by subsection (a) of this section. These funds shall not be used
to supplant State or non-State funds already provided for salaries of noncertified public school
employees.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one hundred forty-four million seven hundred thousand dollars
($144,700,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to implement the provisions of
this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S434-v-1*